Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1062.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; US Route 60 and Superstition mountain drive; left turn lane; intersection improvements The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for costs associated with planning, designing, construction and the acquisition of right-of-way or easements for an additional left turn lane and other intersection improvements at the intersection of U.S. Route 60 and Superstition Mountain Drive.